District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2105.05

Nonprofit housing developments — Definitions.

Repealed.

History

June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-112, § 2, 29 DCR 1687
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-120, § 3, 39 DCR 3195
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 35, 40 DCR 6311
repealed pursuant to § 305 of D.C. Law 11-111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1605.5.

Editor's Notes

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 305 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.